Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6830
Health carrier violation; notice; hearing.

If the director finds that any health carrier doing business in this state is engaging in any violation of the Managed Care Emergency Services Act and that a proceeding in respect thereto would be in the public interest, the director shall issue and serve upon such health carrier a statement of the charges in that respect and a notice of hearing thereon, which notice shall set a hearing date not less than ten days after the date of the notice.

Laws 1998, LB 1162, § 22.